Utah statutes.
16-6a-1516.   Procedure for and effect of revocation.

(1)  If the division determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 16-6a-1515 for revoking the authority of a foreign nonprofit corporation to conduct affairs in this state, the division shall mail to the foreign nonprofit corporation with written notice of the division's determination stating the grounds.

(2) (a)  If the foreign nonprofit corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the division that each ground determined by the division does not exist, within 60 days after mailing of the notice under Subsection (1), the division shall revoke the foreign nonprofit corporation's authority to conduct affairs in this state.

(b)  If a foreign nonprofit corporation's authority to conduct affairs in this state is revoked under Subsection (2)(a), the division shall:

(i)  mail a written notice of the revocation to the foreign nonprofit corporation stating the effective date of the revocation; and

(ii)  mail a copy of the notice to:

(A)  the last registered agent of the foreign nonprofit corporation; or

(B)  if there is no registered agent of record, at least one officer of the corporation.

(3)  The authority of a foreign nonprofit corporation to conduct affairs in this state ceases on the date shown on the division's certificate revoking the foreign nonprofit corporation's certificate of authority.

(4)  Revocation of a foreign nonprofit corporation's authority to conduct affairs in this state does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign nonprofit corporation.

(5)  A notice mailed under this section shall be:

(a)  mailed first class, postage prepaid; and

(b)  addressed to the most current mailing address appearing on the records of the division for:

(i)  the registered agent of the nonprofit corporation, if the notice is required to be mailed to the registered agent; or

(ii)  the officer of the nonprofit corporation that is mailed the notice if the notice is required to be mailed to an officer of the nonprofit corporation.

